Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 156.557 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Formative evaluation" means a continuous cycle of collecting evaluation
information and providing feedback with suggestions regarding the certified
employee's professional growth and performance; and
(b) "Summative evaluation" means the summary of, and conclusions from, the
evaluation data, including formative evaluation data that:
1. Occur at the end of an evaluation cycle; and
2. Include a conference between the evaluator and the evaluated certified
employee and a written evaluation report.
(2) The Kentucky Department of Education, in consultation with the Kentucky teacher
and principal steering committees and other groups deemed appropriate by the
commissioner of education, shall develop a statewide framework for teaching that
shall promote the continuous professional growth and development of skills needed
to be a highly effective teacher or a highly effective administrator in a school or
district.
(3) Each district shall develop and implement a personnel evaluation system aligned
with the statewide framework for teaching established in subsection (2) of this
section that shall:
(a) Use multiple measures of effectiveness;
(b) Include both formative and summative evaluation components;
(c) Measure professional effectiveness;
(d) Support professional growth;
(e) Have at least four (4) performance levels;
(f) Be used to inform personnel decisions;
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/2/2026 4:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1287
(g) Be considerate of the time requirements of evaluators at the local level and
shall not require that all certified school personnel have a formal summative
evaluation each year; and
(h) Rate teachers or administrators by multiple measures instead of a single
measure.
(4) The performance criteria by which teachers and administrators shall be evaluated
shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Performance of professional responsibilities related to his or her assignment,
including attendance and punctuality and evaluating results;
(b) Demonstration of effective planning of curricula, classroom instruction, and
classroom management, based on research-based instructional practices, or
school management skills based on validated managerial practices;
(c) Demonstration of knowledge and understanding of subject matter content or
administrative functions and effective leadership techniques;
(d) Promotion and incorporation of instructional strategies or management
techniques that are fair and respect diversity and individual differences;
(e) Demonstration of effective interpersonal, communication, and collaboration
skills among peers, students, parents, and others;
(f) Performance of duties consistent with the goals for Kentucky students and
mission of the school, the local community, laws, and administrative
regulations;
(g) Demonstration of the effective use of resources, including technology;
(h) Demonstration of professional growth;
(i) Adherence to the professional code of ethics; and
(j) Attainment of the teacher standards or the administrator standards as
established by the Education Professional Standards Board that are not
referenced in paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection.
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/2/2026 4:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1287
(5) The following provisions shall apply to each school district's personnel evaluation
system:
(a) Certified school personnel, below the level of superintendent, shall be
evaluated;
(b) The evaluation system shall include formative evaluation and summative
evaluation components; and
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall adopt administrative regulations
incorporating written guidelines for a local school district to follow in
implementing the personnel evaluation system and shall require the following:
1. All evaluations of certified school personnel below the level of the
district superintendent shall be in writing on evaluation forms and under
evaluation procedures developed by a committee composed of an equal
number of teachers and administrators;
2. The immediate supervisor of the certified school personnel member
shall be designated as the primary evaluator. At the request of a teacher,
observations by other teachers trained in the teacher's content area or
curriculum content specialists may be incorporated into the formative
process for evaluating teachers;
3. All monitoring or observation of performance of a certified school
personnel member shall be conducted openly and with full knowledge of
the personnel member;
4. Evaluators shall be trained, tested, and approved in accordance with
administrative regulations adopted by the Kentucky Board of Education
in the proper techniques for effectively evaluating certified school
personnel. Evaluators shall receive support and resources necessary to
ensure consistent and reliable ratings;
5. The personnel evaluation system shall include a plan whereby the
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/2/2026 4:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1287
person evaluated is given assistance for professional growth as a teacher
or administrator. The system shall also specify the processes to be used
when corrective actions are necessary in relation to the performance of
one's assignment;
6. The system shall require annual summative evaluations for each teacher
or other professional who has not attained continuing service status
under KRS 161.740 or continuing status under KRS 156.800(7). The
system shall require summative evaluations once every five (5) years for
a teacher or other professional who has attained continuing service
status under KRS 161.740 or continuing status under KRS 156.800(7),
principals, assistant principals, and other certified administrators.
Additional summative evaluations may be performed at the discretion of
the superintendent or the immediate supervisor of a teacher or other
professional based upon a case-by-case analysis of the performance
criteria set forth in subsection (4) of this section but shall not be
imposed as a uniform requirement across the system. Each summative
evaluation shall be presented to the local board of education; and
7. The training requirement for evaluators contained in subparagraph 4. of
this paragraph shall not apply to district board of education members.
(6) (a) Each superintendent shall be evaluated according to a policy and procedures
developed by the local board of education and approved by the department.
(b) The summative evaluation of the superintendent shall be in writing, discussed
and adopted in an open meeting of the board and reflected in the minutes, and
made available to the public upon request.
(c) Any preliminary discussions relating to the evaluation of the superintendent
by the board or between the board and the superintendent prior to the
summative evaluation shall be conducted in closed session.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/2/2026 4:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1287
(7) The Kentucky Board of Education shall establish an appeals procedure for certified
school personnel who believe that the local school district failed to properly
implement the evaluation system. The appeals procedure shall not involve requests
from individual certified school personnel members for review of the judgmental
conclusions of their personnel evaluations.
(8) The local board of education shall establish an evaluation appeals panel for certified
school personnel that shall consist of two (2) members elected by the certified
employees of the local district and one (1) member appointed by the board of
education who is a certified employee of the local board of education. Certified
school personnel who think they were not fairly evaluated may submit an appeal to
the panel for a timely review of their evaluation.
(9) The Kentucky Department of Education may annually provide for on-site visits by
trained personnel to review and ensure appropriate implementation of the
evaluation system by the local school district. The department shall provide
technical assistance to local districts to eliminate deficiencies and to improve the
effectiveness of the evaluation system.
(10) The disclosure, pursuant to KRS Chapter 61, of any data or information, including
student growth data, that local school districts or the Kentucky Department of
Education collect on individual classroom teachers under this section is prohibited.
(11) The results of evaluations conducted under this section shall not be included in the
accountability system described in KRS 158.6455 and no reporting requirements
related to these results shall be imposed upon the local school districts by the
Kentucky Department of Education.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/2/2026 4:21 PM Jacketed